Missouri, session 2026, SB1250.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 452.335, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 452.335,
to read as follows:
452.335. 1. In a proceeding for nonretroactive
invalidity, dissolution of marriage or legal separation, or
a proceeding for maintenance following dissolution of the
marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over
the absent spouse, the court may grant a maintenance order
to either spouse, but only if it finds that the spouse
seeking maintenance:
(1) Lacks sufficient property, including marital
property apportioned to him, to provide for his reasonable
needs; and
(2) Is unable to support himself through appropriate
employment or is the custodian of a child whose condition or
circumstances make it appropriate that the custodian not be
required to seek employment outside the home.
2. The maintenance order shall be in such amounts and
for such periods of time as the court deems just, and after
considering all relevant factors including:

SB 1250 2
(1) The financial resources of the party seeking
maintenance, including marital property apportioned to him,
and his ability to meet his needs independently, including
the extent to which a provision for support of a child
living with the party includes a sum for that party as
custodian;
(2) The time necessary to acquire sufficient education
or training to enable the party seeking maintenance to find
appropriate employment;
(3) The comparative earning capacity of each spouse;
(4) The standard of living established during the
marriage;
(5) The obligations and assets, including the marital
property apportioned to him and the separate property of
each party;
(6) The duration of the marriage;
(7) The age, and the physical and emotional condition
of the spouse seeking maintenance;
(8) The ability of the spouse from whom maintenance is
sought to meet his needs while meeting those of the spouse
seeking maintenance;
(9) The conduct of the parties during the marriage; and
(10) Any other relevant factors.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section to the contrary, a maintenance order shall
terminate upon the payor reaching full retirement age,
unless otherwise agreed to by both parties. For purposes of
this subsection, "full retirement age" shall mean the
earlier of the date on which the payor is either eligible
for or begins receiving full retirement benefits under the
federal Social Security Act, but shall not mean "early
retirement age" as defined under the federal Social Security

SB 1250 3
Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 416, as amended. The payor shall
provide the payee reasonable notice in advance of
retirement. Six months notice shall be presumed to be
reasonable.
4. The maintenance order shall state if it is
modifiable or nonmodifiable. The court may order
maintenance which includes a termination date. Unless the
maintenance order which includes a termination date is
nonmodifiable, the court may order the maintenance
decreased, increased, terminated, extended, or otherwise
modified based upon a substantial and continuing change of
circumstances which occurred prior to the termination date
of the original order.
✓